Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Center for the Arts

153.400.
Legislative findings and conclusions.

It is the finding of the General Assembly that cultural opportunities and the arts have a direct and positive impact on the hotel industry through promotion of tourism and convention trade. The Kentucky Center for the Arts will serve as catalyst in the development of Louisville and Jefferson County as a major convention and entertainment center. The Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation will have as management priority the stimulation of the Jefferson County hotel industry and promotion of tourism through:

The presentation of Kentucky and Louisville-area and nationally and internationally prominent arts activities which will attract regional audiences;

Regional and national promotion of events occurring within the Commonwealth, along with ancillary services and activities;

The development, in conjunction with local hotels and the arts and entertainment industry, of tourist packages including performance and group plans;

The active solicitation of arts related conferences and conventions;

The active participation with local hotels and convention bureaus in attracting non-arts related conferences and conventions, with the center serving as an important amenity;

The development of a Kentucky folklore program which will attract participants and an audience from throughout the state;

The contribution to cultural diversity and the attractiveness of Louisville and Jefferson County as a year-round tourist and entertainment attraction.

For these reasons, the General Assembly concludes that the dedication of additional revenues from the increased transient room tax authorized in counties containing first class cities to the Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation will directly benefit the Jefferson County hotel industry, and that this dedication symbolizes the integral relationship between the Kentucky center and promotion of the Jefferson County hotel industry, created by KRS 153.400 to 153.460.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 382, § 1, effective April 9, 1980; 1990, ch. 1, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

153.410.
Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation.

The Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation is hereby established, and shall consist of nineteen (19) members representing metropolitan Louisville and Kentucky to be appointed by the Governor, who shall also designate a chairman. Initial terms shall be staggered; thereafter, members shall be appointed to four (4) year terms.

Members may be removed by the Governor only for cause after being afforded notice, a hearing with counsel before the Governor or his designee, and a finding of fact by the Governor. A copy of charges, transcript of the record of the hearings, and findings of fact shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

The Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation shall be a body corporate with full corporate powers. A quorum of the corporation shall consist of ten (10) members, with a majority of members present authorized to act upon any matter legally before the corporation. Full minutes and records shall be kept of all meetings of the corporation and all official actions shall be recorded.

The corporation may enact bylaws concerning the election of other officers, the creation of an executive committee with full authority to act between regular meetings, and the designation of alternates for members with full voting authority.

The corporation shall be attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet for administrative purposes.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 295, § 37, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 382, § 2, effective April 9, 1980; 1992, ch. 66, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 209, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 95, § 31, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 36, effective June 25, 2009; 2015 ch. 105, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

153.420.
Powers and duties of corporation.

The Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation:

Shall supervise construction of the Kentucky Center for the Arts in conjunction with the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and shall provide all management functions for the facility and for any other property acquired or leased pursuant to its powers under this section;

May take, acquire and hold property, and all interests therein, by deed, purchase, gift, devise, bequest, lease or eminent domain, or by transfer from the State Property and Buildings Commission, and may dispose of any property so acquired in any manner provided by law. In the exercise of its power of eminent domain, it shall proceed in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, KRS 416.540 to 416.680;

May consult or enter into agreements with other segments of the arts and entertainment industry to provide technical, professional, or management support or assistance, consistent with its purpose and mission;

May issue revenue bonds, subject to procedures which shall be established by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, solely payable from the charges, revenues, rentals, and other funds pledged for their payment for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any project or for the acquisition of property;

Shall promote the growth and development of the arts, convention trade, tourism and the hotel industry within Jefferson County and the Commonwealth, through utilization of the Kentucky center and activities authorized in this section to enhance these and the public interest;

May adopt administrative regulations, as provided in KRS Chapter 13A, governing the operation, maintenance or use of property under its custody and control;

May levy a surcharge on tickets for all functions held within the center to contribute to operating revenue;

May receive tax revenues from any governmental unit, and financial contributions of local governments, private persons and foundations;

Shall have exclusive control of all exhibitions, performances and concessions in the Center for the Arts. The corporation shall have a prior lien upon the property of any private exhibitor, concessionaire, or other person holding an exhibition or performance or operating a concession in the center, and may sell such property upon ten (10) days’ notice to satisfy any indebtedness;

Shall develop in conjunction with local hotels, and the arts and entertainment industry, tourist packages including performance and group plans, and shall participate with local hotels and convention bureaus in attracting non-arts related conferences and conventions;

May establish an executive committee from among its membership with full authority to act between its meetings to the extent delegated by the corporation;

May sue and be sued and maintain and defend legal actions in its corporate name;

May, if the corporation elects, be exempt from the provisions of KRS 56.065 to 56.180, and, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Department of Insurance, purchase from the funds allotted to the corporation property insurance for buildings and contents from responsible insurance companies doing business in this state; and

May purchase liability insurance for the protection of the corporation and its employees from liability arising in the operation of the center.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 295, § 38, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 382, § 3, effective April 9, 1980; 1988, ch. 189, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 1, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 66, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 24, § 190, effective July 15, 2010.

153.430.
Executive director — Staff — Use of revenues — Audit.

The Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation shall appoint an executive director, who shall hold office at its pleasure, and shall serve in a full-time capacity. The executive director shall be the chief administrative officer of the corporation and shall provide the staff direction and coordination in implementing the program and discharging the duties of the corporation. The executive director is authorized to act under direction of the corporation in employing necessary staff to perform its duties and exercise its powers as assigned by KRS 153.420.

The staff shall keep all minutes, records and orders of the corporation, and shall be responsible for preservation of all such documents, which are public records subject to KRS 61.870 to 61.884. The staff shall also perform any other duties assigned by the executive director, with approval of the corporation.

All revenues derived by the corporation from the use of the Kentucky Center for the Arts, or contributions to the Kentucky Center for the Arts from any other source as authorized in KRS 153.420, shall be solely used to defray the expenses of the Kentucky Center for the Arts, including payment on debt, the cost of management and operation of its facilities, the creation of an adequate reserve for repair, replacement, debt service and capital improvements, and the procurance of insurance and promotional activities. Any additional revenues in excess of amounts necessary to defray the actual costs and expenses properly related to the conduct of any activity authorized in KRS 153.420 derived by the corporation from any other source, or as a result of any other activity authorized in KRS 153.420, shall similarly be used solely for the purposes enumerated in this section. An annual audit of all funds of the corporation and its affiliated entities shall be made by the State Auditor of Public Accounts, and reported to the Governor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 295, § 39, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 382, § 4, effective April 9, 1980; 1990, ch. 1, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

153.440.
Levy of additional transient room tax by county containing city of the first class or consolidated local government.

In addition to the three percent (3%) transient room tax authorized by KRS 91A.390, fiscal courts in counties containing cities of the first class or consolidated local governments may levy an additional transient room tax not to exceed one percent (1%) of the rent for every occupancy of a suite, room, or rooms, charged by all persons, companies, corporations, or other like or similar persons, groups, or organizations doing business as motor courts, motels, hotels, inns, or like or similar accommodations’ businesses. All moneys collected from the tax authorized by this section shall be turned over to the Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation and shall be used to defray operating costs of the Kentucky Center for the Arts.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 382, § 5, effective April 9, 1980; 2002, ch. 346, § 173, effective July 15, 2002.

153.450.
Levy of additional transient room taxes by urban-county government — Restrictions on use of proceeds — Sunset.

In addition to the four percent (4%) transient room tax authorized by KRS 91A.390 an urban-county government may levy an additional transient room tax not to exceed two percent (2%) of the rent for every occupancy of a suite, room, or rooms, charged by all persons, companies, corporations, or other like or similar persons, groups, or organizations doing business as motor courts, motels, hotels, inns, or like or similar accommodations’ businesses.

All additional moneys collected from the tax authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall be applied toward the retirement of bonds used to finance a nonprofit corporation which is created for the funding, construction, and management of a convention center in an urban-county, and to defray the operating costs of the nonprofit corporation.

As used in this subsection, “project” means the renovation, expansion, or improvement of a convention center on or after July 15, 2016.
(3) (a)

As used in this subsection, “project” means the renovation, expansion, or improvement of a convention center on or after July 15, 2016.

In addition to the levy authorized by subsection (1) of this section, an urban-county government may levy an additional transient room tax not to exceed two and one-half percent (2.5%) to provide funding for a project.

Proceeds from the levy shall be used only for the direct expenditure for, or repayment of debt associated with, the project.

The levy shall sunset upon completion of the project and repayment of all associated debt.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 382, § 7, effective April 9, 1980; 1986, ch. 11, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 158, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2016 ch. 137, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

153.460.
Levy of surcharge on tickets and on restaurant gross receipts by county containing city of first class or consolidated local government.

As used in this section:

“Multipurpose arena” means a facility whose principal use includes but is not limited to the exhibition of collegiate basketball competition;

“Restaurant” means any facility operated for profit which has minimum seating capacity of fifty (50) people at tables and which receives less than fifty percent (50%) of its annual food and beverage income from the sale of alcohol.

Fiscal courts in counties containing cities of the first class or consolidated local governments may levy:

A ten percent (10%) surcharge on all tickets sold by a multipurpose arena located in the county and constructed after April 9, 1980; and

A one-fourth of one percent (0.25%) tax on gross receipts from the sale of food and beverages of all restaurants located in the county.

All moneys collected from the surcharge on tickets and the restaurant tax shall be placed in a fund to be used to defray operating expenses of any such multipurpose arena.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 382, § 8, effective April 9, 1980; 2002, ch. 346, § 174, effective July 15, 2002; 2012, ch. 125, § 5, effective July 12, 2012.